test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-keqrres_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩeʹrres e-stem ahkio: # Noun - full paradigm
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Nom: ǩeʹrres
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Gen: ǩeʹrrez
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Acc: ǩeʹrrez
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Ill: ǩeʹrrsa
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Loc: ǩeʹrrsest
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Com: ǩeʹrrsin
     ǩeʹrres+N+Ess: ǩeʹrrsen
     ǩeʹrres+N+Par: ǩeʹrrsed
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Abe: [ǩeʹrreztaa, ǩeʹrreztää]
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Nom: ǩeʹrrez
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Gen: ǩeʹrrsi
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Acc: ǩeʹrrsid
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Ill: ǩeʹrrsid
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Loc: ǩeʹrrsin
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Com: ǩeʹrrsivuiʹm
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Abe: [ǩeʹrrsitaa, ǩeʹrrsitää]
